Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2305
Meetings; certificates of competency; examination; rules.

The air conditioning air distribution board shall meet at least once a month at a fixed time as determined by the city council or chairman and board of trustees. The board shall adopt rules for the examination at such times and places of all persons who desire a certificate of competency to engage in the business of designing, installing, altering, repairing, cleaning or adding to any air conditioning air distribution system, furnace, restaurant appliance hood and duct system or other exhaust or intake ventilating system within the city or village and also within the area of zoning jurisdiction outside the corporate limits of cities of the metropolitan class.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 5, p. 469.